Utah statutes.
53B-13-111.   Loans or purchase of obligations -- Rules -- Options --
Repayment of federally insured loans.
(1)  The board may purchase obligations from lenders or make loans to eligible
borrowers, out of money available to the board for loans.  The board shall
promulgate rules for determining the needs of the respective borrowers for
loans and for the purpose of making loans or purchasing obligations.  The
amount of an obligation purchased by the board or of a loan made by the board
to an eligible borrower, whether enrolled or to be enrolled in a private
institution or a tax-supported public institution, is determined by the board
upon the basis of substantially similar standards and guides set forth in the
board's rules.  The board, in determining the needs of eligible borrowers for
guaranteed loans, may consider the amount of assistance available to the
students.
(2)  When the board purchases an obligation or makes a loan, and again
immediately before a repayment schedule on the loan or obligation is signed by
the borrower, the board shall cause a written statement to be delivered to the
borrower describing in detail whether an option exists and, if so, who may
exercise the option, under what conditions the option may be exercised, and
what options are available relating to the following:
(a)  the term of the loan;
(b)  the repayment period on the loan;
(c)  an extension of the term or repayment period on the loan and the
conditions of repayment under the extension;
(d)  a deferment or forbearance on the repayment of the loan or on interest
accruing on the loan, whether interest is to be paid during the deferment or
forbearance, and the terms of repayment after the deferment or forbearance;
(e)  the period of time between installment payments on the loan and whether
graduated or unequal installment payments may be made;
(f)  the minimum annual payment on the loan, and if more than one loan is
taken from the board or if the borrower takes or has taken an educational loan
from another source, the availability of consolidation, transfer, or
assignment of the loans and the minimum annual payment on the aggregate of the
loans;
(g)  the granting of an interview before or at the time the borrower signs a
repayment schedule; and
(h)  the revision or renegotiation of the repayment schedule on the loan after
repayment has commenced, or if other educational loans from the board or
another source are taken after the repayment has commenced.
(3)  On obligations purchased or loans made by the board which are federally
insured loans, the board may establish variable repayment schedules conforming
to the need and documented income levels of borrowers, if the schedules are
not inconsistent with federal laws, rules, or regulations governing the
insured loans.  A borrower making payments on a loan may request and be
granted a revised repayment term or schedule based upon the established
variable repayment schedules.
